Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2684] Powers additional to other
powers. The powers conferred by this subpart shall be in addition and
supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law concerning any university
project, university system, or network or any combination thereof, or the
issuance of revenue bonds. Revenue bonds may be issued pursuant to this
subpart for those purposes notwithstanding that any other law may provide for
the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement,
betterment, or extension of a like undertaking or the establishment,
maintenance, or extension of a like university project, university system, or
network or any combination thereof, or the issuance of revenue bonds, without
regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations, or other provisions
contained in any other law. Except as expressly provided in any other law,
this subpart shall control. [L 2007, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next